Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Purposes and Powers

§ 17-16-301.
Purposes.

Every corporation incorporated under this act has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.

A corporation engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under this act only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

§ 17-16-302.
General powers.

Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs, including without limitation power to:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend in its corporate name;

Have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

Make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

Purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

Purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire; own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of; and deal in and with shares or other interests in, or obligations of, any other entity;

Make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities of the corporation, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises, or income;

Lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

Be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity;

Conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this act within or without this state;

Elect directors and appoint officers, employees, and agents of the corporation, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

Pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share option plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any or all of its current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents;

Make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

Transact any lawful business; and

Make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the business and affairs of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

For discussion as to when corporate veil may be pierced,

see Amfac Mechanical Supply Co. v. Federer, 645 P.2d 73,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The New Wyoming Business Corporation Act,” see XV Wyo. L.J. 185 (1961).

For article, “Corporate Expression in Wyoming Ballot Issues, Referenda and Initiatives: A Political and Legal Dilemma,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 449 (1979).

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of a business corporation to donate to a charitable or similar institution, educational and religious institution, or medical institution, 39 ALR2d 1192.

Construction and effect of corporate articles, charter or bylaws limiting duration or maturity of indebtedness, 55 ALR2d 949.

Corporation's practice of architecture, 56 ALR2d 726.

Corporation's power to enter into partnership, joint venture or mining partnership, 60 ALR2d 917.

Right of corporation to indemnity for civil or criminal liability incurred by employee's violation of antitrust laws, 37 ALR3d 1355.

Criminal liability of corporation for extortion, false pretenses or similar offenses, 49 ALR3d 820.

Criminal liability of corporation for bribery or conspiracy to bribe public official, 52 ALR3d 1274.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented, 16 ALR4th 185.

§ 17-16-303.
Emergency powers.

In anticipation of or during an emergency defined in subsection (d) of this section, the board of directors of a corporation may:

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent; and

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

During an emergency defined in subsection (d) of this section, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise:

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors whom it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner, including by publication and radio; and

One (1) or more officers of the corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum.

Corporate action taken in good faith during an emergency under this section to further the ordinary business affairs of the corporation:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

An emergency exists for the purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some extraordinary event.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

§ 17-16-304.
Ultra vires.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the validity of corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

A corporation’s power to act may be challenged in a proceeding by:

A shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the act;

The corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation; or

The attorney general under W.S.

17-16-1430

.

In a shareholder’s proceeding under paragraph (b)(i) of this section to enjoin an unauthorized corporate act the court may enjoin or set aside the act, if equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding, and may award damages for loss, other than anticipated profits, suffered by the corporation or another party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to form and contents of share certificates, see §

17-16-625

.

As to failure to conform share certificates in bearer form as ultra vires act, see § 17-16-625(f).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).